Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-451 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created within the State Department of
Health the Oklahoma Rare Disease Advisory Council.
B. The purpose of the Council shall be to provide guidance and
recommendations to educate the public, the Legislature, and other

Req. No. 12482 Page 1

stat e agencies, as appropriate, on the needs of individuals with
rare diseases living in this state.
C. The Council shall conduct the following activities to
benefit those impacted by rare diseases in this state:
1. Convene public hearings, make inquiries, and solicit
comments from the general public in Oklahoma to assist the Council
with a first-year landscape or survey of the needs of rare disease
patients, caregivers, and providers in the state;
2. Provide testimony and comments on pending legislation and
regulations before the Legislature, if called, and other state
agencies that impact Oklahoma's rare disease community;
3. Consult with experts on rare diseases to develop policy
recommendations to improve patient access to, and quality of, rare
disease specialists, affordable and comprehensive health care
coverage, relevant diagnostics, timely treatment, and other needed
services;
4. Establish best practices and protocols to include in-state
planning related to natural disasters, public health emergencies, or
other emergency declarations to enable continuity of care for rare
disease patients and ensure safeguards against discrimination for
rare disease patients are in place;
5. Identify areas of unmet need for research and opportunities
for collaboration across stakeholders and other state rare disease

Req. No. 12482 Page 2

advi sory councils that can inform future studies and work done by
the Council; and
6. Research and identify best practices to reduce health
disparities and achieve health equity in the research, diagnosis,
and treatment of rare disease in this state.
D. 1. The Council's appointment process shall be conducted in
a transparent manner to provide interested individuals an
opportunity to apply for membership on the Council. All members of
the Council shall be full-time residents of this state as
practicable. Membership shall include a diverse set of stakeholders
representative of the geographic and population diversity of the
state.
2. The Governor shall appoint the chair of the Council not
later than December 1, 2025. The chair shall not hold any position
within the government of this state.
3. The Governor shall appoint seven (7) members:
a. two patients who have a rare disease,
b. two caregivers of a person with a rare disease,
c. one representative of the biopharmaceutical industry,
d. one representative of a rare disease patient
organization that operates in this state, and
e. one representative of a health plan company.
4. The State Department of Health shall appoint five (5)
members:
Req. No. 12482 Page 3

a. one representative of the State Department of Health's
Office of Minority Health and Health Equity, or
successor division,
b. one registered nurse or Advanced Practice Registered
Nurse licensed and practicing in this state with
experience treating rare diseases,
c. one physician practicing in this state with experience
treating rare diseases,
d. one pharmacist with experience dispensing drugs used
to treat rare diseases, and
e. one member of the scientific community who is engaged
in rare disease research including, but not limited
to, a medical researcher with experience conducting
research on rare diseases.
5. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall appoint two (2)
members:
a. one representative of the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority, and
b. one geneticist or genetic counselor.
6. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
shall appoint one member who is a mental health provider with
experience treating rare disease patients in this state.
7. The State Regents for Higher Education shall appoint one
member who is a representative of an academic research institution
Req. No. 12482 Page 4

in t he state that receives any grant funding for rare disease
research.
E. 1. The Council shall electronically submit a report to the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, the Speaker of
the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the Governor within one
(1) year of establishment of the Oklahoma Rare Disease Advisory
Council and annually thereafter. Prior to submission, a draft of
the annual report shall be made available for public comment and
discussed at an open public meeting.
2. The annual reports shall:
a. describe the activities and progress of the Council
under this section, and
b. provide recommendations to the Legislature and
Governor on ways to address the needs of people living
with rare diseases in this state.
F. 1. The initial meeting of the Council shall occur no later
than February 1, 2026. Thereafter, the Council shall meet no less
than quarterly.
2. The Council shall:
a. provide opportunities for the public to hear updates
and provide input into its work, and
b. create and maintain a public website where meeting
minutes, notices of upcoming meetings, and public
comments may be submitted.
Req. No. 12482 Page 5

G. 1. The Governor shall appoint the chair for an initial term
of three (3) years. At the end of the chair's initial three-year
term, and every two (2) years thereafter, members of the Council
shall elect, by a majority vote, a new chair.
2. Council members shall serve no longer than three (3) years,
except that, to facilitate a staggered rotation of members to retain
continuity and knowledge transfer, during the initial five (5) years
after the establishment of the Council, members may serve up to a
four-year term.
3. If a vacancy occurs, the Council, by a majority vote, shall
fill such vacancy in a timely manner and in compliance with
requirements set forth in subsection D of this section.
H. As used in this section, "rare disease", also known as an
orphan disease, means a disease that affects fewer than two hundred
thousand (200,000) people in the United States.
I. The members of the Council shall be paid a per diem in
accordance with the State Travel Reimbursement Act when attending
Council meetings or other activities associated with the duties of
the Council members.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12482 TJ 02/13/25


Req. No. 12482 Page 6